Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-801
Public buildings; cost; limitation; use; change prohibited.

Any public building that is erected or repaired and for which an appropriation is made by the Legislature shall be constructed or repaired in a complete manner within the limits of such appropriation. Except as provided in sections 72-811 to 72-818 and 79-11,109, no building shall be changed or diverted from the use or purpose, kind, or class of building from that for which the appropriation was originally made.

Laws 1911, c. 131, § 1, p. 441;

R.S.1913, § 5891;

C.S.1922, § 5258;

C.S.1929, § 72-1001;

R.S.1943, § 72-801;

Laws 1973, LB 547, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 1241, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 567, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1059;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 5;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 4.